Utah statutes.
53A-24-305.   Appointment of advisory council.

(1)  The board shall appoint an advisory council to advise and assist the office, DSBVI, and, as appropriate, the board in matters relating to the needs of individuals who are blind or have visual  impairments and the activities of DSBVI.

(2)  At least one-third of the members of the council shall be individuals who are blind or have visual impairments.

(3)  Members may be reimbursed for authorized actual and necessary expenses incurred by them in the performance of their official duties.



Amended by Chapter 37, 1996 General Session

